apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="m/ůj__prn">
      <e><p>          <l>ejch</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ejch</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ejm</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ejma</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oje</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oje</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oje</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oje</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oje</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oje</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oji</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oji</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>oji</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ojí</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ojí</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ojí</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ojí</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ojí</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ou</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ou</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uj</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uj</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uj</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ym</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ym</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>á</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>á</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>á</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>á</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>á</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>é</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ého</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ého</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ém</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ému</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>í</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>í</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ý</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ý</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ý</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ý</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ý</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ý</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ý</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ých</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ých</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ýho</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ýho</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ým</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ým</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ým</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ýma</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ými</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ýmu</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ůj</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ůj</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ůj</l><r>ůj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="můj"><i>m</i><par n="m/ůj__prn"/></e>
